Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska9-629.01
Gross proceeds; use; professional baseball organization.

As authorized in section 19-4701, a city of the metropolitan or primary class or a county in which a city of the metropolitan class is located which conducts a lottery pursuant to the Nebraska County and City Lottery Act may use a portion of the gross proceeds from such lottery for the acquisition, purchase, and maintenance of a professional baseball organization.

Laws 1991, LB 795, § 5.